Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 659A.030 is amended to read:
659A.030. (1) It is an unlawful employment practice:
(a) For an employer, because of an individual’s race, color,  religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, national origin,  marital status or age if the individual is 18 years of age or older,
or because of the race, color, religion,  sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
marital status or age of any other person with whom the individual associates, or because  of an
individual’s juvenile record that has been expunged pursuant to  ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271, to refuse
to hire or employ the individual or to bar  or discharge the individual from employment. However,
discrimination is not an unlawful  employment practice if the discrimination results from a bona fide
occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the employer’s business.
(b) For an employer, because  of an individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, national origin, marital status or age if the individual is 18 years of  age or older,
or because of the race, color, religion, sex,  sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
marital status or  age of any other person with whom the individual associates, or because of an
individual’s juvenile record that has been  expunged pursuant to ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271, to dis-
criminate  against  the individual in compensation or in terms, conditions or privileges of employment.
(c) For a labor organization,  because of an individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orien-
tation, gender identity, national origin, marital status or age  if the individual is 18 years of age or
older, or because of an individual’s juvenile record that has been expunged  pursuant to ORS
419A.260 to 419A.271, to exclude or to expel from its membership the individual or  to discriminate
in any way against the individual or any other person.
(d) For any employer or employment agency to print or circulate or cause to  be printed or cir-
culated any statement, advertisement or publication,  or to use any form of application for employ-
ment or to make any inquiry in connection with prospective  employment that expresses directly or
indirectly any limitation,  specification or discrimination as to an individual’s race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital status or age if the individual  is 18
Enrolled House Bill 3187 (HB 3187-A) Page 1
years of age or older, or on the basis of an expunged juvenile record, or any intent to make any such
limitation, specification or discrimination, unless based upon a bona fide  occupational qualification.
Identification of prospective employees according to race, color,  religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity, national origin, marital status  or age does not violate this section unless the Com-
missioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, after a hearing conducted pursuant to  ORS
659A.805, determines that the designation expresses an  intent to limit, specify or discriminate on the
basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, marital  status
or age.
(e) For an employment agency, because of an individual’s  race, color, religion, sex, sexual ori-
entation, gender identity, national origin, marital status or age if the individual is 18 years  of age
or older, or because of the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender  identity, national
origin, marital status or  age of any other person with whom the individual associates, or because
of an individual’s juvenile record that has been expunged  pursuant to ORS 419A.260 to 419A.271, to
classify or refer for employment, or to fail or refuse to refer for employment,  or otherwise to dis-
criminate against the individual. However, it is not an  unlawful employment practice for an em-
ployment agency to classify or refer for  employment an individual when the classification or referral
results from a bona fide occupational qualification reasonably necessary to the normal operation of
the employer’s business.
(f) For an employer, prospective  employer or employment agency, prior to completing an
initial interview, or if there is no initial interview, prior to making a conditional offer of
employment, to request or require disclosure of the applicant’s age or date of birth  or when
the applicant attended or graduated from any educational institution,  except when such in-
formation is required to:
(A) Affirm that the applicant meets bona fide occupational qualifications; or
(B) Comply with any provision of federal, state or local law, rule or regulation.
[(f)] (g) For any person to discharge, expel or otherwise discriminate against any other  person
because that other person has opposed any unlawful practice, or because that other  person has filed
a complaint, testified or assisted in any proceeding under this chapter or has attempted to do so.
[(g)] (h) For any person, whether an employer or an employee, to  aid, abet, incite, compel or
coerce the doing of any of the acts forbidden under this chapter or to attempt to do so.
(2) The provisions of this  section apply to an apprentice under ORS 660.002 to 660.210[ , but the
selection of an apprentice  on the basis of the ability to complete the required apprenticeship training
before attaining the age of 70 years is not  an unlawful employment practice ]. The commissioner shall
administer this section  with respect to apprentices under ORS 660.002 to 660.210 equally with regard
to all employees and labor organizations.
(3) The compulsory retirement of employees required by  law at any age is not an unlawful em-
ployment practice if lawful under federal law.
(4)(a) It is not  an unlawful employment practice for an employer or labor organization to provide
or make financial provision for child  care services of a custodial or other nature to its employees
or members who are responsible for a minor child.
(b) As used in this subsection, “responsible for a minor child”  means having custody or legal
guardianship of a minor child or acting in loco parentis to the child.
(5) This section does not prohibit an employer from  enforcing an otherwise valid dress code or
policy, as long as the employer provides, on a case-by-case basis, for reasonable accommodation of
an individual based on the health and safety needs of the individual and the dress code or  policy
does not have a  disproportionate adverse impact on members of a protected class to a greater extent
than the policy impacts persons generally.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 654.062 is amended to read:
654.062. (1) Every  employee should notify the employer of any violation of law, regulation or
standard pertaining to safety and health in the  place of employment when the violation comes to the
knowledge of the employee.
Enrolled House Bill 3187 (HB 3187-A) Page 2
(2) However, any employee  or representative of the employee may complain to the Director of
the Department  of Consumer and Business Services or any authorized representatives of the director
of any violation of law, regulation or standard pertaining  to safety and health in the place of em-
ployment, whether or not the employee also notifies the employer.
(3) Upon receiving any employee complaint, the director shall make inquiries, inspections and
investigations that the director considers reasonable and appropriate. When an employee or  repre-
sentative of the employee has complained in writing of an  alleged violation and no resulting citation
is issued to the employer, the director shall  furnish to the employee or representative of the em-
ployee, upon written request, a statement of reasons for the decision.
(4) The director shall establish procedures  for keeping confidential the identity of any employee
who requests protection in writing.  When a request has been made, neither a written complaint from
an employee, or representative of  the employee, nor a memorandum containing the identity of a
complainant may be disclosed under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(5) It is an unlawful employment practice for any person to bar or discharge from  employment
or otherwise discriminate against any employee or prospective employee because the employee  or
prospective employee has:
(a) Opposed any practice forbidden by ORS 654.001 to 654.295,  654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to
654.780;
(b) Made any  complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related
to ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780,  or has testified or is about to
testify in any such proceeding;
(c) Exercised on behalf of  the employee, prospective employee or others any right afforded by
ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780;
(d) In good faith reported an assault that occurred on  the premises of a health care employer
as defined in ORS 654.412 or in the home of a patient receiving home health care services; or
(e) With no reasonable alternative and in good faith, refused to expose the employee  or pro-
spective employee to serious injury or death arising from a hazardous condition  at a place of em-
ployment.
(6)(a) Any employee or prospective employee alleging to have been barred or discharged from
employment or otherwise discriminated against  in compensation, or in terms, conditions or privi-
leges of employment,  in violation of subsection (5) of this section may, within one year after the
employee or prospective employee has reasonable cause to believe that the  violation has occurred,
file a complaint with  the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries alleging discrimi-
nation under the provisions of ORS 659A.820. Upon receipt of the complaint  the commissioner shall
process the complaint under the procedures, policies and remedies established by ORS chapter 659A
and the policies established by ORS  654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780 in
the same way and to the same extent that the complaint  would be processed if the complaint in-
volved allegations of unlawful employment practices under ORS 659A.030 [ (1)(f)] (1)(g).
(b) Within 90 days after receipt  of a complaint filed under this subsection, the commissioner
shall notify the complainant of the commissioner’s determination.
(c) The affected employee or prospective employee may bring a civil action  in any circuit court
of the State of Oregon against any person  alleged to have violated subsection (5) of this section.
The civil action must be commenced within  one year after the employee or prospective employee
has reasonable cause to believe a violation has occurred, unless a complaint  has been timely filed
under ORS 659A.820.
(d) The commissioner or the circuit court may order all appropriate relief including rehiring  or
reinstatement to the employee’s former position with back pay.
(7)(a) In any action brought under subsection (6) of this section,  there is a rebuttable
presumption that a violation of subsection (5) of this section  has occurred if a person bars or dis-
charges an employee or prospective  employee from employment or otherwise discriminates against
an employee or prospective employee within 60 days  after the employee or prospective employee has
engaged in any of the protected  activities described in subsection (5)(a) to (e) of this section. The
Enrolled House Bill 3187 (HB 3187-A) Page 3
person may  rebut the presumption that a violation of subsection (5) of this section has occurred by
a demonstration of a preponderance of the evidence.
(b) If a person bars or discharges an  employee or prospective employee from employment or
otherwise discriminates against  the employee or prospective employee more than 60 days after the
employee or prospective employee has engaged in any of  the protected activities described under
subsection (5)(a) to (e) of this section,  such action does not create a presumption in favor of or
against finding that a violation of subsection (5) of this section has  occurred. Where such action has
occurred more than  60 days after the protected activity, this subsection does not modify any existing
rule of case law relating to the proximity of time between  a protected activity and an adverse em-
ployment action. The burden of proof shall be on the employee or  prospective employee to demon-
strate by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation occurred.
(8) The director shall adopt rules necessary for the administration  of subsection (5)(e) of this
section that are in accordance  with the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (29
U.S.C. 651 et seq.).
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3187 (HB 3187-A) Page 4